Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-655.02
Combined taxes; courts; jurisdiction; actions.

The courts of this state shall in the manner provided in sections 48-655 to 48-655.02 entertain actions to collect combined taxes or interest thereon for which liability has accrued under the employment security law of any other state or of the federal government.

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 14(3), p. 430;

Laws 1994, LB 1337, § 13.